Utah statutes.
34-23-208.   Exceptions.
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to a person who is 16 years of
age or older and for whom employment would not endanger his health and safety
if that person:
(1)  has received a high school diploma;
(2)  has received a school release certificate;
(3)  is legally married; or
(4)  is head of a household.
